North Carolina, session 2025, HB1162.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Wilson County to make allocations
to fire departments located within the county for (i) upgrading emergency lighting on fire trucks
with blue lights that are activated when the vehicle is not in motion for the purpose of increasing
visibility and motorist compliance and (ii) other costs for upkeep, updating, or replacing of fire
equipment or vehicle parts.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1162-v-1*